Massachusetts, session 194th, H999.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special laws to the contrary, there shall be established a 
commission called the deer population control commission, hereinafter referred to as the 
commission, for the purpose of identifying best practices and methods for controlling the deer 
population in Bristol, Plymouth, Barnstable, Berkshire, Hampden, Worcester, Franklin, and 
Hampshire Counties.  
The commission shall be made up of 6 members: 1 member of the Senate, whom shall be 
appointed by the Senate President; 1 member of the House of Representatives, whom shall be 
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 1 member representing local Rod and 
Gun Clubs, who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Bow Hunters Association; 1 member 

of 2 10 representing the Massachusetts Department of Agriculture, who shall be appointed by the 
Secretary of the Department of Agricultural Resources; 1 member representing the 
Massachusetts Department of Fish and Wildlife, who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of 
the Department of Fish and Wildlife; 1 licensed automobile insurance broker representing the 
insurance industry, who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Association of Insurance 
Agents.  
The commission shall recommend best practices for controlling the Commonwealth’s 
deer population and methods for assisting farmers in preventing and combating property damage 
caused by deer.  The commission shall file its findings and recommendations, together with 
drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, with the Clerks of the 
Senate and the House of Representatives, and the chairs of the Joint Committee on Environment, 
Natural Resources and Agriculture no later than March 1, 2024.